Hawaii statutes.
§437-42 Sections 445-171 and 445-172 not to
apply. Sections 445-171 and 445-172 do not apply to dealers and
salespersons licensed under this chapter. [L 1939, c 258, §25; RL 1945, §7385;
am L 1951, c 90, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-186; am L 1957, c 302, §1(27); am L
1961, c 59, §1(16); HRS §437-42; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next